Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-465
Aquaculture facilities; application for permits; fee.

An application for an aquaculture permit to operate an aquaculture facility shall be made to the commission on a form prescribed by the commission. The application shall include (1) the name, social security number if the applicant is an individual, residence, and place of business of the applicant, (2) the exact description of the land upon which the facility is to be located and the nature of the applicant's title to the land, whether in fee or under lease, and (3) the kind and approximate number of aquatic organisms authorized to be kept or reared in the facility. The annual fee for an aquaculture permit shall be not more than seventy-five dollars, as established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. The permit shall expire at midnight on December 31 in the year for which the permit is issued.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VII, § 3, p. 438;

C.S.1929, § 37-703;

R.S.1943, § 37-703;

Laws 1949, c. 100, § 3, p. 276;

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 18, p. 473;

Laws 1967, c. 216, § 17, p. 590;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 25;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 15;

Laws 1995, LB 718, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 91;

R.S.Supp.,1997, § 37-703;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 175;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 49;

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 24;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 11;

Laws 2008, LB1162, § 9.